California, session 20252026, AB1506.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5261 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:5261. The department shall develop and maintain develop, maintain, and post on its internet website a list of invasive pests that have a reasonable likelihood of entering California for which a detection, exclusion, eradication, control, or management action by the state might be appropriate. In developing the list, the department shall consider any invasive pests identified by the federal or state government for which a detection, exclusion, eradication, control, or management action might be undertaken.